South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S216.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 14-7-840 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 14-7-840.  No person is exempt from service as a juror in any court of this State except men and women sixty-five seventy-five years of age or over.  Notaries public are not considered state officers and are not exempt under this section.  A person exempt under this section may be excused upon telephone confirmation of date of birth and age to the clerk of court or the chief magistrate.  The jury commissioners shall not excuse or disqualify a juror under this section.  The clerk of court shall maintain a list of persons excused by the court and the reasons the juror was determined to be excused. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----